Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,129
Application for nail technology licensure; procedure.

No application for any type of licensure shall be considered complete unless all information requested on the application form has been supplied, all seals and signatures required have been obtained, and all supporting and documentary evidence has been received by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 32;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 91;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,184;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 391;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 46.